Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1,107
Consumer credit transaction; default; consumer's right to cure.

(1) With respect to a consumer credit transaction, after a default a creditor may neither accelerate maturity of the unpaid balance of the obligation nor take possession of collateral, except voluntarily surrendered collateral, because of such default until twenty days after a notice of the consumer's right to cure is given. The consumer shall have twenty days after the notice is given to cure any default by tendering the amount of all unpaid sums due at the time of the tender, without acceleration, plus any unpaid charges, or by tendering any other performance necessary to cure the default as specified in the notice of right to cure. Cure shall restore the consumer to his or her rights under the agreement as though the default had not occurred.

(2) With respect to defaults on the same obligation after a creditor has once given notice of the consumer's right to cure, the consumer shall have no further right to cure and the creditor has no obligation to proceed against the consumer or the collateral.

Laws 1983, LB 111, § 3.